Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 29. Local and Regional Railroad Authorities
§ 19-29-43.
Aid and cooperation of political subdivisions.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, acquisition, construction, reconstruction or operation of the railroad facilities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, any county for which an authority has been created and any city, town or village located therein, may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Lend or donate money out of the county or municipal general fund to the authority;

Provide that all or a portion of the taxes or funds available or to become available to, or required by law to be used by the county for railroad purposes be transferred or paid directly to the railroad authority as such funds become available to the county;

Cause water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other facilities which it is empowered to provide, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with such railroad or railroad facilities;

Dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses or any other rights or privileges therein to the authority;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways and walks from established streets or roads to such railroads or railroad facilities;

Do any and all things, whether or not specifically authorized in this section and not otherwise prohibited by law, that are necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate with the authority in the planning, undertaking, construction, reconstruction, acquisition or operation of railroads or railroad facilities; and

Enter into agreements with the authority respecting action to be taken by the county, city, town or village pursuant to the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-45.
Annual report and recommendations of railroad authorities.

At least once a year an authority shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county, or each county if it is a regional authority, and the Governor’s office of planning and coordination, a report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-47.
Provisions inapplicable to certain counties with port commissions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable with respect to any county in which an existing port commission is authorized to purchase and operate or lease railroad facilities pursuant to Section 59-7-453, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-49.
Powers to be supplemental.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-51.
Provisions to be controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1980.